Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 594 of Title 21, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any pharmacist, physician, nurse, medical provider, midwife,
dentist, veterinarian, paramedical employee, or provider of first
aid or emergency medical services, or any employee of a hospital,
clinic, nursing home, sanitarium, or person associated with any
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1612 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

othe r medical institution or office where patients regularly receive
care, who tends or treats, or any person who is requested to
examine, tend, or treat, at any location, any human being suffering
from a wound, injury, or illness and who has reason to believe that
such wound, injury, or illness:
1. Was caused by or appears to arise from a bullet wound, a
gunshot wound, a powder burn, or any other injury arising from the
discharge of a firearm;
2. Was caused by or appears to arise from a knife, an ice pick,
or any other sharp or pointed instrument or deadly weapon believed
to have been intentionally inflicted upon a person;
3. Was caused by or appears to arise from poisoning;
4. Was caused by or appears to arise from an incendiary or
explosive device or is a burn injury or wound if the victim has
sustained second- or third-degree burns to five percent (5%) or more
of the body, the victim has sustained burns to the upper respiratory
tract or sustained laryngeal edema from inhaling superheated air, or
the victim has sustained a burn injury or wound that may result in
the victim’s death; or
5. Is a wound, injury, or illness that would seriously maim,
would produce death, or has rendered the injured person unconscious,
and was caused by the use of violence or was sustained in a
suspicious or unusual manner or in the commission of a crime,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1612 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

shal l report the wound, injury, or illness to a law enforcement
agency with jurisdiction at the location in which such treatment is
administered or the request for such treatment is received. Such
reports shall contain the name, address, race, sex, current
whereabouts, and age of the patient, and shall also contain the
nature and extent of the injury, wound, illness, or burn, any other
information that might be helpful in establishing the cause of the
injury, wound, illness, or burn and the identity of the person who
caused the injury, wound, illness, or burn if known, and any facts
that might assist in detecting crime including, but not limited to,
providing any video recorded at or maintained by the reporting
facility where the patient is depicted even if such video includes
depictions of other patients. Such reports shall be made
immediately by telephone with video and any other physical record to
be provided within seventy-two (72) hours of a request by the law
enforcement agency investigating the report. A facility providing
video pursuant to this section may blur the images of any
individuals who are not the patient about whom a report is made and
who are not individuals associated with or assisting the patient
about whom a report is made.
B. 1. A person who has rendered treatment or assistance for a
crime the reporting of which is addressed in Section 58 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall report injuries, wounds, or
illnesses that fall under subparagraph 1, 2, 3, or 4 of subsection A
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1612 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of t his section even if the crimes listed in Section 58 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes are not reported.
2. A person who has rendered treatment or assistance for a
crime the reporting of which is addressed in Section 40.3A of Title
22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall report injuries, wounds, or
illnesses that fall under subsection A of this section even if the
crimes listed in Section 40.3A of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes
are not reported.
C. A person who renders treatment for any reportable injury,
wound, illness, or burn shall ensure that any bullet, foreign
object, clothing showing damage potentially related to the
reportable injury, wound, illness, or burn, or any other item which
may be potential evidence related to the report that is removed from
any such patient, shall be identified as coming from such patient
and kept in a manner that preserves the integrity of the item, until
an employee of such entity surrenders the item to the law
enforcement agency to whom the report is made.
D. No privilege or contract shall relieve any person from the
requirement of reporting pursuant to this section or prevent any
person from testifying regarding information acquired from a patient
treated for a reportable injury, wound, illness, or burn if such
testimony is otherwise admissible. Any provision of law or rule of
evidence relating to confidentiality of such treatment is abrogated

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1612 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

for and does not apply to communications and testimony pursuant to
this section.
E. Any person who makes a report required by this section shall
be immune from civil liability for the making of such reports and
shall have immunity with respect to any good-faith participation in
any judicial proceeding or any other proceeding resulting from the
report of the injury, wound, illness, or burn.
F. Any report of an injury, wound, illness, or burn required to
be reported pursuant to this section shall not become a public
record. Law enforcement shall keep confidential and redact any
information identifying the reporter in a report required pursuant
to this section unless otherwise ordered by a court. Other
employees of a facility with knowledge of a report required by this
section shall not disclose information identifying the reporter
unless otherwise ordered by the court or as part of an investigation
by local law enforcement.
G. The reporting obligations pursuant to this section are
individual except that when two or more persons who are required to
report are present and jointly have knowledge of a known or
suspected injury, wound, illness, or burn that is required to be
reported pursuant to this section, and when there is an agreement
among these persons to report as a team, the team may select by
mutual agreement a member of the team to make a report by telephone
and a single written report as required by subsection A of this
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1612 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

sect ion. The written report shall be signed by the selected member
of the reporting team. Any member who has knowledge that the member
designated to report has failed to do so shall thereafter make the
report.
H. No employer, supervisor, administrator, governing body, or
other entity shall interfere with the reporting obligations of any
employee or other person or in any manner discriminate or retaliate
against an employee or other person who in good faith files a report
pursuant to this section. Any employer, supervisor, administrator,
governing body, or other entity who discharges, discriminates, or
retaliates against an employee or other person for making a report
or providing information or testimony for proceedings related to a
reportable injury, wound, illness, or burn pursuant to this section
shall be liable for damages, costs, and attorney fees.
I. Any person who knowingly and willfully fails to file a
report or who interferes with prompt reporting required pursuant to
this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.
Any person who knowingly and willfully makes a report pursuant to
this section when the person knows the report lacks factual
foundation shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor. A
violation of this subsection shall be punishable by a fine not more
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), by imprisonment in a county
jail for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1612 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

J. The provisions of this section shall not apply to such
injuries, wounds, illnesses, or burns received by any member of the
Armed Forces of the United States or of this state while engaged in
the actual performance of duty.
K. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
affect any requirement that a person must report child abuse or
neglect pursuant to Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes except that
when making a report of child abuse or child neglect pursuant to
Title 10A, the reporting facility is required to provide any video
recorded at or maintained by the reporting facility where the
patient is depicted even if such video includes depictions of other
patients. Such video and any other physical record shall be
provided within seventy-two (72) hours of a request by the law
enforcement agency investigating the report.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 595 of Title 21, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any owner of a garage, parking lot, or other place of which
the primary purpose is storage, repair, or maintenance of vehicles,
or any employee of such owner, who knows or becomes aware of the
fact that any motor vehicle so stored or left has upon it, or in it,
bullet marks, gunshot marks, blood stains, or marks or evidence of
any purported crime, shall immediately report the facts to a law
enforcement agency of this state.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1612 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection A of
this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by a fine not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00),
by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six (6) months,
or by both such fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1612 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)